src/pers-myv-morph.txt
LEXICON kit-PersPronGen_CX-2
+Abe:%>втО1мО1 kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Abl:%>дО1  kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Comp:%>шка kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+DatCx:%>нень  PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:т 0:е 0:н 0:ь "+Det":0 "+SG":0 "+DatCx":0 "@U.DNUM.SG@" > Clitic ; 
+Ela:%>стО1 kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Gen:%>О1нь PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
+Ill:%>с PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
+Ine:%>сО1 kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Lat:%>О1в PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
+Prl:Г2а kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Tra:%>О1кс osh-PersPronGenCX_DX ;

LEXICON kudo-PersPronGen_CX-2
+Abe:%>втО1мО1 kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Abl:%>дО1  kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Comp:%>шка kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+DatCx:%>нень  PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:т 0:е 0:н 0:ь "+Det":0 "+SG":0 "+DatCx":0 "@U.DNUM.SG@" > Clitic ; 
+Ela:%>стО1 kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Gen:%>нь PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
+Ill:%>с PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
+Ine:%>сО1 kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Lat:%>в PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
+Prl:%>Г2а kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Tra:%>кс osh-PersPronGenCX_DX ;

LEXICON kal-PersPronGenCX_DX
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:т 0:ь "+Det":0 "+Gen":0 "+SG":0 "@U.DNUM.SG@"> Clitic ;
     PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;

LEXICON osh-PersPronGenCX_DX
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:т 0:ь "+Det":0 "+Gen":0 "+SG":0 "@U.DNUM.SG@"> Clitic ;
     PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;

LEXICON kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX
< 0:">" 0:н 0:т 0:ь "+Det":0 "+Gen":0 "+SG":0 "@U.DNUM.SG@"> Clitic ;
     PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;


LEXICON PersPronGenCX_DX-1
!< "+Indet":0 "@U.DNUM.SG@"> Clitic ;
 Clitic; 



LEXICON PossPX1
< 0:">" 0:н 0:Ь2 "+ScSg1":0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:м  "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+ScSg1":0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:т 0:Ь2 "+ScSg2":0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:т 0:Ь2 "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+ScSg2":0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:з 0:О1 "+ScSg3":0 "@U.PossPx.3Sg@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:О1 0:к "+ScPl1":0 "@U.PossPx.1Pl@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:к "+ScPl2":0 "@U.PossPx.2Pl@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:с 0:т "+ScPl3":0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:с 0:т "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+ScPl3":0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@"> Clitic ;

!!Q!
!LEXICON PossPX1
!< 0:%> 0:н 0:Ь2 %+PxSg1:0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@">  SecondaryDeclination ;
!< 0:%> 0:м  %+Dial:0 %+PxSg1:0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@">  SecondaryDeclination ;
!< 0:%> 0:т 0:Ь2 %+PxSg2:0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@">  SecondaryDeclination ;
!< 0:%> 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Dial:0 %+PxSg2:0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@">  SecondaryDeclination ;
!< 0:%> 0:н 0:з 0:О1 %+PxSg3:0 "@U.PossPx.3Sg@">  SecondaryDeclination ;
!< 0:%> 0:н 0:з 0:о %+Dial:0 %+PxSg3:0 "@U.PossPx.3Sg@">  SecondaryDeclination ;
!< 0:%> 0:н 0:О1 0:к %+PxPl1:0 "@U.PossPx.1Pl@">  SecondaryDeclination ;
!< 0:%> 0:н 0:к %+PxPl2:0 "@U.PossPx.2Pl@">  SecondaryDeclination ;
!< 0:%> 0:с 0:т %+PxPl3:0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@">  SecondaryDeclination ;
!< 0:%> 0:н 0:с 0:т %+Dial:0 %+PxPl3:0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@">  SecondaryDeclination ;




!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!
! =========== !
! Conjugation !
! =========== !

LEXICON Tenses1_Prep-SG
<"@P.NUM.SG@"> Tenses1 ;

LEXICON osh-Tenses1_Prep-SG
<"@P.NUM.SG@"> osh-Tenses1 ;

LEXICON kudo-Tenses1_Prep-SG
<"@P.NUM.SG@"> kudo-Tenses1 ;



LEXICON kit-Tenses1
 kal-Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:"TLoss" 0:т 0:А2 0:н 0:о "+Use/Sub/Short":0 "+Pred":0 "+Pres":0 "+ScPl1":0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:"TLoss" 0:т 0:А2 0:д 0:о "+Use/Sub/Short":0 "+Pred":0 "+Pres":0 "+ScPl2":0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitic ;


LEXICON lak-Tenses1
 kal-Tenses1 ;

LEXICON kal-Tenses1
 Clitic ;
 Tenses1_A  ; !This provides a linking vowel

LEXICON osh-Tenses1
 kal-Tenses1 ;

LEXICON kudo-Tenses1
 Clitic ;
< 0:А2 0:н "+Pred":0 "+Pres":0 "+ScSg1":0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> Clitic ;
< 0:А2 0:т "+Pred":0 "+Pres":0 "+ScSg2":0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> Clitic ;
< 0:т 0:А2 0:н 0:о "+Pred":0 "+Pres":0 "+ScPl1":0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitic ;
< 0:т 0:А2 0:д 0:о "+Pred":0 "+Pres":0 "+ScPl2":0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+ScSg1":0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:л 0:и 0:т 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+ScSg2":0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:л 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+ScSg3":0 "@U.TPERS.3@" "@D.TNUM.PL@" > Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:е 0:к "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+ScPl1":0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:л 0:и 0:д 0:е "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+ScPl2":0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:л 0:ь 0:т 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+ScPl3":0 "@U.TPERS.3@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitic ;



LEXICON Tenses1_A
< 0:А2 0:н "+Pred":0 "+Pres":0 "+ScSg1":0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> Clitic ;
< 0:А2 0:т "+Pred":0 "+Pres":0 "+ScSg2":0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> Clitic ;
< 0:т 0:А2 0:н 0:о "+Pred":0 "+Pres":0 "+ScPl1":0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitic ;
< 0:т 0:А2 0:д 0:о "+Pred":0 "+Pres":0 "+ScPl2":0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+ScSg1":0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:л 0:и 0:т 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+ScSg2":0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:л 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+ScSg3":0 "@U.TPERS.3@" "@D.TNUM.PL@" > Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:е 0:к "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+ScPl1":0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:л 0:и 0:д 0:е "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+ScPl2":0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:л 0:ь 0:т 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+ScPl3":0 "@U.TPERS.3@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitic ;
